Alaska statutes. Title 30. Navigation, Harbors, Shipping, and Transportation Facilities.
Article 3. Miscellaneous.

Sec. 30.30.160.
Regulations. [Repealed, § 14 ch 65 SLA 2013.]

Sec. 30.30.165.
Enforcement authority.

The following persons are peace officers of the state for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter on the waters of the state:

an employee of the department or other person authorized by the commissioner of natural resources;

an employee of a municipality authorized by the chief executive officer of the municipality; or

a peace officer, as that term is defined in AS

01.10.060

.

A person designated in (a) of this section, when enforcing the provisions of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter, may

execute a warrant or other process issued by an officer or court of competent jurisdiction;

administer or take an oath, affirmation, or affidavit; and

issue a citation or arrest a person who violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter.

A citation issued under (b) of this section must comply with the provisions of AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

.

History.

(§ 27 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 39,
ch. 111, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 30.30.170.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“abandoned” means a vessel has been left unattended on private, state, or municipal land or waters of the state without the consent of the landowner or lessee for more than 30 days;

“department” means the Department of Natural Resources;

“municipality” has the meaning given in AS

29.71.800

;

“owner” means a person who

has a property interest, other than a financial or security interest, in a vessel;

is the last named owner of a vessel with the Department of Administration or the United States Coast Guard; or

is designated as having an interest in a vessel in an agreement with a municipality, state agency, or political subdivision of the state;

“state agency” means a department, agency, division, or office in the executive branch of state government;

“vessel” means every description of watercraft, floating facility, or other artificial contrivance, other than a seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on or through the water;

“waters of the state” means the navigable waters within the territorial limits of the state, and the marginal sea adjacent to the state, as defined in AS 44.03.

History.

(§ 1 ch 131 SLA 1975; am E.O. No. 39, § 11 (1977); am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 30 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 13 ch 65 SLA 2013; am §§ 28, 29 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996 and 2018, the terms in this section were renumbered to maintain alphabetical order. Also in 2018, sec. 29, ch. 111, SLA 2018, enacted a new definition for “state agency” even though the term was already defined in this section; under AS

01.05.031

, the revisor of statutes has chosen to treat the enactment of the new definition as a repeal of the former definition of “state agency”.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 25, 2013, deleted the definition of “department”, added the definitions of “municipality” and “state agency”, and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (3) [now (6)] inserted “, floating facility,” following “description of watercraft”; added (5) [now (1)], (6) [now (2)], (7) [now (4)], and (8) [now (5)].

Sec. 30.30.180.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Derelict Vessels Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 131 SLA 1975; am § 30 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, deleted “Abandoned and” following “may be cited as”.